apertium-quc.quc.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-R

@U.VAL.1@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.1@  TV-R-VAL ;
@U.VAL.2@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.2@                    TV-R-NONFIN ;
@U.VAL.2@@R.SS@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.2@@R.SS@        SS-TV-R  ;

LEXICON V-TV-D

@U.VAL.1@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.1@  TV-D-VAL ;
@U.VAL.2@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.2@%>j                            TV-D-NONFIN ;
@U.VAL.2@@R.SS@%<v%>%<tv%>:@U.VAL.2@@R.SS@%>j     #   ;

LEXICON V-IV

@D.SS@%<v%>%<iv%>:@D.SS@        IV-NONFIN ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<v%>%<iv%>:@R.Pref.ON@        SS-IV ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<v%>%<iv%>:@R.Pref.ON@        # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                        L  E  X  I  C  O  N                                !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous

! Man/ma/na dialect variation
man%<neg%>:man # ;
ma%<neg%>:ma # ;
na%<neg%>:na # ;
taj%<neg%>%<fin%>:taj # ; ! Clause final
taj%<neg%>:ta # ; ! Clause non-final

taq%<pl%>:taq # ;
e%<pl%>:e # ;
jetaq%<pl%>:jetaq # ;
la%<qst%>:la # ;
si%<emph%>:si # ;

maj%<part%>%<neg%>:maj  # ; ! "none; nothing"

kʼo%<part%>%+ik%<aux%>:kʼol%>%{i%}k # ;
kʼo%<part%>:kʼo # ;
e%<pl%>+kʼo%<part%>:ekʼo # ;
tajin%<aux%>:tajin # ;  ! Use/Colloq
katajin%<aux%>:katajin # ;
chik%<part%>:chik # ; ! "ya no/otra vez/ya esta" ! Src/Lopez Ixcoy 1997
pe%<part%>:pe # ; !
kʼut%<part%>:kʼu # ; ! 2nd interrogation particle  p.167 Table 4.2.
kʼut%<part%>:kʼut # ; ! 2nd interrogation particle
xas%<part%>:xas # ; ! Src/Biblia
xas%<part%>:xaas # ; ! Src/LopezIxcoy1997
la%<part%>%<frm%>:la # ; !
alaq%<part%>%<frm%>:alaq # ; !
are%<foc%>:are # ;

sin%<part%>:sin # ; ! Affective 

nakʼut%<adv%>:nakʼut # ; ! "pues"

bʼaʼ%<mod%>:bʼaʼ # ; ! "pues"
bʼaʼ%<mod%>:baʼ # ; ! "pues"
bʼaʼ%<mod%>:bʼa # ; ! "pues"

alo%<ij%>:alo # ;
mmm%<ij%>:mmm # ;
aaa%<ij%>:aaa # ;
ay%<ij%>:ay # ;
je%<ij%>:je # ;                  ! "sí; yes"
jeʼ%<ij%>:jeʼ # ;                ! "sí; yes" ! Src/LopezIxcoy1997

amen%<ij%>:amen # ;

jat%<ij%>:jat # ;
jix%<ij%>:jix # ;

! jeʼ nakʼut = así es

! "indicator of feminine youth"
ali%<clf%>%<f%>:al # ; ! "baby girl or young woman"
ali%<clf%>%<f%>:ali # ; ! "baby girl or young woman"

ala%<clf%>%<m%>:ala # ; ! "baby boy or young man"
ala%<clf%>%<m%>:a # ; ! "baby boy or young man"

tat%<clf%>%<m%>:tat # ; ! "old/respected man"
nan%<clf%>%<f%>:nan # ; ! "old/respected woman"

LEXICON Conjunctions
xaneʼ:xaneʼ   CC ;                  ! "pero; but"
xane:xane   CC ;                    ! "pero; but"
tzare:tzare   CC ;                  ! "pero; but"
on:on CC ;                          ! "o; or"
kʼuriʼ:kʼuriʼ CC ;                  ! "entonces; so" ! Src/Biblia
kʼuriʼ:kʼuri CC ;                  ! "entonces; so" ! Src/Cuentos
tekʼuriʼ:tekʼuriʼ CC ;              ! "y; and"
tekʼuriʼ:tekʼuri CC ;              ! "y; and" ! Use/Spell

chiʼl:chiʼl CC ;                    ! "y"  ! E kʼo achijabʼ chiʼl ixoqibʼ e bʼanäl taqanïk.

e:e CC ;  ! Src/Biblia

xuqujeʼ:xuqujeʼ CC ;                ! "y" ! Src/Ley2009-9 ! 

pero:pero CC ;                      ! "pero" ! Src/CanPixabaj

we¹:we CS ;                          ! "si; if"
weta:weta CS ;                      ! "si" ! Src/Biblia
pune:pune CS ;                      ! "aunque; although"
kneʼbʼaʼ:kneʼbʼaʼ CS ;              ! "aunque" ! Src/Biblia
kʼut:kʼut CC ;                      ! "pero"
tekʼut:tekʼut CC ;                      ! "pero"
kʼut:kʼu CC ;                      ! "pero"
arech:arech CS ;                    ! "para que"
arechaʼ:arechaʼ CS ;                    ! "para que"
arechiʼ:arechiʼ CS ;                    ! "cuando"
! Chi is also a conjunction introducing object complement clauses of transitive verbs (I see that you did this).
chi:chi CS ;                       ! introduces finite complement clauses
rech:rech CS ;                       !     b.  reech   introduces finite purpose clauses
taq:taq CS ;                       !     e.   taq/are taq, chi riʼ/chriʼ/ introduces temporal clauses
chriʼ:chriʼ CS ;                       !     e.   taq/are taq, chi riʼ/chriʼ/ introduces temporal clauses
chiʼ:chiʼ CS ;                       !     e.   taq/are taq, chi riʼ/chriʼ/ introduces temporal clauses

aretaq:aretaq CS ;          ! "when, while"
aretaq:aretäq CS ;          ! "when, while"
pine:pine CS ; ! "aunque" ;

pine%<cnjsub%>%+man%<neg%>:pine%>mna # ; ! "aunque no" ;
pine%<cnjsub%>%+man%<neg%>:pine%>man # ; ! "aunque no" ;

we¹%<cnjsub%>%+man%<neg%>:we%>mna # ; ! "si no" ;
we¹%<cnjsub%>%+man%<neg%>:we%>man # ; ! "si no" ;

par:par CC ; ! "pero"

!  These ri/le/we articles also serve as subordinators
ri:ri CS;               ! "" ! ri ixoq ri xpe Chwitzʼaq xulik
we²:we CS ;               ! ""
le:le CS ;               ! ""


LEXICON Direccionales

uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:uloq # ;              ! "toward speaker, here, toward here"
uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:loq # ;              ! "toward speaker, here, toward here"
uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:ulo # ;              ! "toward speaker, here, toward here" ! Src/CanPixabaj
la%<adv%>%<dir%>:la # ;              ! "toward speaker, here, toward here"
na%<adv%>%<fut%>:na # ;                  ! "marker of future or certainty"

na%<adv%>%<fut%>%+uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:nuʼ%>loq # ; ! Na + (u)loq > nuʼloq
na%<adv%>%<fut%>%+la%<adv%>%<dir%>:nuʼ%>la # ; ! Na + la > nuʼla

la%<part%>%<frm%>%+uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:luʼ%>loq # ; ! la + loq > luʼloq
la%<part%>%<frm%>%+la%<adv%>%<dir%>:luʼ%>la # ; ! la + la > luʼla

! Check wi = "Trace" ?
wi%<adv%>%<dir%>%+uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:wuʼ%>loq # ; ! wi + loq > wuʼloq
wi%<adv%>%<dir%>%+la%<adv%>%<dir%>:wuʼ%>la # ; !  wi + la > wuʼla

chi%<adv%>%+uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:chuʼ%>loq # ; ! chi + loq > chuʼloq
chi%<adv%>%+la%<adv%>%<dir%>:chuʼ%>la # ; !  chi + la > chuʼla

taj%<neg%>%+uloq%<adv%>%<dir%>:tuʼ%>loq # ; ! Na…taj + loq > Na… tuʼloq
taj%<neg%>%+la%<adv%>%<dir%>:tuʼ%>la # ; !  Na…taj + la > Na…tuʼla

bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:bʼi IK ;
na%<adv%>%<fut%>%+bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:nuʼ%>bʼi IK ;
la%<part%>%<frm%>%+bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:luʼ%>bʼi IK ; !la + bʼik > luʼbʼik ! la + bʼi > luʼbʼi
wi%<adv%>%<dir%>%+bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:wuʼ%>bʼi IK ; !wi + bʼik > wuʼbʼik !wi + bʼi > wuʼbʼi
chi%<adv%>%+bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:chuʼ%>bʼi IK ; !chi + bʼik > chuʼbʼik ! chi + bʼi > chuʼbʼi
taj%<neg%>%+bʼi%<adv%>%<dir%>:tuʼ%>bʼi IK ; !na…taj + bʼik > na…tuʼbʼik ! na…taj + bʼi > na…tuʼbʼi

kan%<adv%>%<dir%>:kan OQ ;
apan%<adv%>%<dir%>:apan OQ ;
qʼan%<adv%>%<dir%>:qʼan OQ ;
qaj%<adv%>%<dir%>:qaj OQ ;

! FIXME: check
uk%<adv%>%<dir%>:uk OQ ;

wi%<foc%>:wi # ;

ka%<adv%>%<dir%>%+oq%<aux%>:koq # ;
ka%<adv%>%<dir%>:ka # ;

LEXICON Relationals

!ach:ach Rel ;                      ! ""
ech:ech Rel ;                      ! "de"
ech:e Rel ;                      ! "de" ! Src/ALMG ! Ri nutat xutaʼ chi awe jun ujalom.
naqaj:naqaj Rel ;                  ! "cerca" ! TODO: Check
onojel:onojel Rel ;                ! "todos"
pam:pam Rel ;                      ! "adentro" ! TODO: Check
!re:re Rel ;                        ! "" ! Src/LopezIxcoy1997
tukel:tukel Rel ;                  ! "solo"
ukʼ:ukʼ Rel ;                      ! "con"
umal:umal Rel ;                    ! "por"
wach:wach Rel ;                    ! "frente"
wiʼ:wiʼ Rel ;                      ! "con"
wiʼ:wi Rel ;                      ! "con"
xeʼ:xeʼ Rel ;                      ! "abajo"
xoʼl:xoʼl Rel ;
mox:mox Rel ;
ij:ij Rel ; ! "atrás"
wikiqʼabʼ:wikiqʼab Rel ;
tzalaj:tzalaj Rel ;
tzalaj:tzal Rel ;  ! "al lado" ! Src/ALMG ! Src/Biblia
jujunal:jujunal Rel ;              !

! The reflexive marker –ibʼ  occurs also in nouns.
! It does not take possessive markers if it is not possessed.
ibʼ:ibʼ Rel ;                      ! ""
ibʼ%<n%>%<rel%>:ibʼ # ;            ! ""


LEXICON Determiners

we%<det%>:we # ;                   ! "este; this"
le%<det%>:le # ;                   ! "el; the"
ri%<det%>:ri # ;                   ! "el; the"
jun%<det%>%<ind%>:jun # ;                   ! "uno/una; a"
!waʼ%<det%>:waʼ # ;                 ! "this"

LEXICON TVʼ
atzʼamij:atzʼami                   V-TV-D ; ! "salt"
bʼeyetajisaj:bʼayitajisa            V-TV-D ; ! "cause to be delayed"
bʼuk:buk                            V-TV-R ; ! "cover"
chap:chap                          V-TV-R ; ! "take hold of"
chobʼresaj:chobresa                 V-TV-D ; ! "fertilize"
chup:chup                          V-TV-R ; ! "extinguir"
chʼik:chʼik                        V-TV-R ; ! "poke with a needle"
chʼoʼjij:chʼoʼji                   V-TV-D ; ! "fight over something"
jal:jal                            V-TV-R ; ! "change"
jalkʼatij:jalkʼati                 V-TV-D ; ! "move from one place to another"
jeq:jeq                            V-TV-R ; ! "begin to do"
juq:juq                            V-TV-R ; ! "scrape (metal on stone to sharpen)"
juruj:juru                         V-TV-D ; ! "pull up"
kem:kem                            V-TV-R ; ! "weave something"
kototej:kotote                     V-TV-D ; ! "twist something"
kuch:kuch                          V-TV-R ; ! "gather together"
kʼex:kʼex                          V-TV-R ; ! "be changed"
kʼiyisaj:kʼiyisa                   V-TV-D ; ! "plant"
kʼorkʼ:kʼorkʼ                    V-TV-R   ; ! "knock (as on a door)"
loqʼabʼej:loqʼabe                   V-TV-D ; ! "watch over"
maj:maj                             V-TV-R ; ! "take hold, to take away forcibly"
naqʼatisaj:naqʼatisa               V-TV-D ; ! "accustom someone to something"
nukʼ:nukʼ                          V-TV-R ; ! "join (two wires, etc.)"
paqchij:paqchi                     V-TV-D ; ! "reject something (food)"
pil:pil                            V-TV-R ; ! "butcher"
pus:pus                            V-TV-R ; ! "cut something in pieces (bread)"
putzukaj:putzuka                   V-TV-D ; ! "tangle something (twine"
qʼej:qʼe                           V-TV-D ; ! "pour liquid into something"
qʼul:qʼul                          V-TV-R ; ! "skin (animal)"
riq:riq                            V-TV-R ; ! "encontrar; find"
räqʼlapuj:räqʼlapu                 V-TV-D ; ! "reflect (mirror)"
sok:sok                            V-TV-R ; ! "wound"
sukʼubʼaj:sukbʼa                    V-TV-D ; ! "repair; arreglar" ! Src/Dico
taq:taq                            V-TV-R ; ! ";send, command"
tijoj:tijo                         V-TV-D ; ! "teach"
tol:tol                            V-TV-R ; ! "work wood (log as a house beam)"
turij:turi                         V-TV-D ; ! "fan"
tzʼaqatisaj:tzʼaqatisa             V-TV-D ; ! "honor"
tʼin:tʼin                          V-TV-R ; ! "dip in thick liquid"
waqatij:waqati                     V-TV-D ; ! "a violent fight"
ximbʼej:ximbe                       V-TV-D ; ! "tie something"
yak:yak                            V-TV-R ; ! "arise"
yuqʼej:yuqʼe                       V-TV-D ; ! "lead"
LEXICON IVʼ
bʼaq:baq                            V-IV   ; ! "wash (hair)"
bʼotzʼ:botzʼ                        V-IV   ; ! "to roll up"
chaʼn:chaʼn                        V-IV   ; ! "choose"
chuqʼkaʼn:chuqʼkaʼn                V-IV   ; ! "boil"
chʼokow:chʼokow                    V-IV   ; ! "limp"
jamin:jamin                        V-IV   ; ! "pour out"
jisjobʼ:jisjobʼ                    V-IV   ; ! "tear (fabric on a nail)"
jär:jär                            V-IV   ; ! "dissolve (salt, sugar in water)"
kolon:kolon                        V-IV   ; ! "save"
kʼatänir:kʼatänir                  V-IV   ; ! "get hot"
luqul:luqul                        V-IV   ; ! "flop"
mutzutz:mutzutz                    V-IV   ; ! "crunch (with mouth)"
pet:pet                            V-IV   ; ! "come"
qat:qat                            V-IV   ; ! "approach"
raqʼoqʼ:raqʼoqʼ                    V-IV   ; ! "talk a lot"
soʼsot:soʼsot                      V-IV   ; ! "steam (hot bowl of soup)"
toqʼon:toqʼon                      V-IV   ; ! "gore (bull)"
tzʼaktzʼat:tzʼaktzʼat              V-IV   ; ! "be well fitted (planks for houseʼs walls)"
walqoʼt:walqoʼt                    V-IV   ; ! "roll (stone off mountainside)"
xubʼan:xuban                        V-IV   ; ! "whistle"
yux:yux                            V-IV   ; ! "become crestfallen"
